Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1911
License; fees; disposition.

The amount of the fees for original and renewal licenses shall be as established by the city council or village board of trustees based on the amounts actually necessary to administer the licensing program, but not to exceed twenty-five dollars per license. All license fees shall be paid to the city treasurer or village treasurer to be distributed in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 9, p. 324;

R.S.1913, § 5284;

C.S.1922, § 4507;

C.S.1929, § 19-311;

R.S.1943, § 19-311;

Laws 1961, c. 57, § 9, p. 214;

Laws 1995, LB 36, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB107, § 7.